Wisconsin, session 2025, AB824.
do enact as follows:AB824,11Section 1. 165.71 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 165.71 (1m).AB824,22Section 2. 165.71 (1g) of the statutes is created to read:AB824,2,33165.71 (1g) In this section:AB824,2,74(c) “Campground” means a parcel or tract of land owned by a person, the state, 5or a local government that is designed, maintained, intended, or used for the 6purpose of providing campsites, offered with or without charge, for temporary 7overnight sleeping accommodations.AB824,2,88(m) “Lodging establishment” means any of the following:AB824,2,991. A bed and breakfast establishment, as defined in s. 97.01 (1g).AB824,2,11102. A hotel or motel. In this subdivision, “hotel” or “motel” has the meaning 11given for “hotel” in s. 97.01 (7).AB824,2,12123. A tourist rooming house, as defined in s. 97.01 (15k).AB824,2,13134. A short-term rental, as defined in s. 66.0615 (1) (dk).AB824,2,14145. A campground.AB824,315Section 3. 165.71 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB824,2,1816165.71 (2) (intro.) The department of justice shall make the poster under sub. 17(1) (1m) available to others to print from its Internet site website and shall 18encourage its display at each of the following places:AB824,419Section 4. 165.71 (2) (b) of the statutes is repealed.AB824,520Section 5. 165.71 (2) (bg) of the statutes is created to read:AB824,3,11165.71 (2) (bg) Lodging establishments.AB824,62Section 6. 165.71 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB824,3,43165.71 (2) (bm) Premises operated under a license or permit issued under s. 4125.26, 125.27, or 125.51 (3), (3m), or (5).AB824,75Section 7. 165.71 (2) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:AB824,3,66165.71 (2) (dm) Tattoo establishments, as defined in s. 463.10 (1) (b).AB824,87Section 8. 165.71 (2) (em) of the statutes is created to read:AB824,3,88165.71 (2) (em) Job recruitment centers.AB824,99Section 9. 165.71 (2) (fm) of the statutes is created to read:AB824,3,1110165.71 (2) (fm) Community-based residential facilities, as defined in s. 50.01 11(1g).AB824,1012Section 10. 165.71 (2) (m) of the statutes is created to read:AB824,3,1513165.71 (2) (m) Public and private elementary and secondary schools, in an 14area of the school building that is intended to be accessed by adult staff members 15only.AB824,3,1616